Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1234.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1403.2. Scoliosis Screening and Examination.--(a) Screening for scoliosis shall be included in school health programs. Scoliosis is an appreciable lateral deviation of the normally straight vertical line of the spine or one or more lateral rotary curvatures of the spine.(b) A scoliosis screening test shall be administered to students in grades five, six, seven and nine and to age-appropriate students in ungraded classes.(c) Scoliosis screening shall be conducted in accordance 123456789101112131415161718192021 with administrative and professional guidelines by personnel who meet the qualifications standards adopted by the Secretary of Health and the Secretary of Education.(d) Students who are under observation or care for scoliosis by a physician or students whose parents object in writing to the screening need not be tested.(e) The Department of Health shall issue administrative guidelines to schools to ensure compliance with this section. Results of the screening shall become part of the pupil's school health record.Section 2. The provisions of 28 Pa. Code § 23.10 (relating to scoliosis screening) are abrogated.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1234PN1526 - 2 - 12345678910111213